Illinois, session 104th, SB2971.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rehabilitation of Persons with Disabilities 5Act is amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2405/3)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3434)7    Sec. 3. Powers and duties. The Department shall have the 8powers and duties enumerated herein:9        (a) To cooperate with the federal government in the 10    administration of the provisions of the federal 11    Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended by the Workforce 12    Innovation and Opportunity Act, and of the federal Social 13    Security Act to the extent and in the manner provided in 14    these Acts.15        (b) To prescribe and supervise such courses of 16    vocational training and provide such other services as may 17    be necessary for the vocational rehabilitation of persons 18    with one or more disabilities, including the 19    administrative activities under subsection (e) of this 20    Section; to cooperate with State and local school 21    authorities and other recognized agencies engaged in 22    vocational rehabilitation services; and to cooperate with 23    the Department of Children and Family Services, the   SB2971- 2 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    Illinois State Board of Education, and others regarding 2    the education of children with one or more disabilities.3        (c) (Blank).4        (d) To report in writing, to the Governor, annually on 5    or before the first day of December, and at such other 6    times and in such manner and upon such subjects as the 7    Governor may require. The annual report shall contain (1) 8    information on the programs and activities dedicated to 9    vocational rehabilitation, independent living, and other 10    community services and supports administered by the 11    Director; (2) information on the development of vocational 12    rehabilitation services, independent living services, and 13    supporting services administered by the Director in the 14    State; and (3) information detailing the amounts of money 15    received from federal, State, and other sources, and of 16    the objects and purposes to which the respective items of 17    these several amounts have been devoted.18        (e) (Blank).19        (f) To establish a program of services to prevent the 20    unnecessary institutionalization of persons in need of 21    long term care and who meet the criteria for blindness or 22    disability as defined by the Social Security Act, thereby 23    enabling them to remain in their own homes. Such 24    preventive services include any or all of the following:25            (1) personal assistant services;26            (2) homemaker services;  SB2971- 3 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1            (3) home-delivered meals;2            (4) adult day care services;3            (5) respite care;4            (6) home modification or assistive equipment;5            (7) home health services;6            (8) electronic home response;7            (9) brain injury behavioral/cognitive services;8            (10) brain injury habilitation;9            (11) brain injury pre-vocational services; or10            (12) brain injury supported employment.11        The Department shall establish eligibility standards 12    for such services taking into consideration the unique 13    economic and social needs of the population for whom they 14    are to be provided. Such eligibility standards may be 15    based on the recipient's ability to pay for services; 16    provided, however, that any portion of a person's income 17    that is equal to or less than the "protected income" level 18    shall not be considered by the Department in determining 19    eligibility. The "protected income" level shall be 20    determined by the Department, shall never be less than the 21    federal poverty standard, and shall be adjusted each year 22    to reflect changes in the Consumer Price Index For All 23    Urban Consumers as determined by the United States 24    Department of Labor. The standards must provide that a 25    person may not have more than $10,000 in assets to be 26    eligible for the services, and the Department may increase   SB2971- 4 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    or decrease the asset limitation by rule. The Department 2    may not decrease the asset level below $10,000. Subject to 3    federal approval, the Department shall allow a recipient's 4    spouse, guardian, kin, or siblings to serve as his or her 5    provider of personal care or similar services.6        The services shall be provided, as established by the 7    Department by rule, to eligible persons to prevent 8    unnecessary or premature institutionalization, to the 9    extent that the cost of the services, together with the 10    other personal maintenance expenses of the persons, are 11    reasonably related to the standards established for care 12    in a group facility appropriate to their condition. These 13    non-institutional services, pilot projects or experimental 14    facilities may be provided as part of or in addition to 15    those authorized by federal law or those funded and 16    administered by the Illinois Department on Aging. The 17    Department shall set rates and fees for services in a fair 18    and equitable manner. Services identical to those offered 19    by the Department on Aging shall be paid at the same rate. 20        Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, 21    personal assistants shall be paid at a rate negotiated 22    between the State and an exclusive representative of 23    personal assistants under a collective bargaining 24    agreement. In no case shall the Department pay personal 25    assistants an hourly wage that is less than the federal 26    minimum wage. Within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the   SB2971- 5 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    effective date of Public Act 100-23), the hourly wage paid 2    to personal assistants and individual maintenance home 3    health workers shall be increased by $0.48 per hour. Wages 4    and other benefits for personal assistants shall not count 5    against benefits that guardians receive as outlined in 6    Article XIa of the Probate Act of 1975. 7        Solely for the purposes of coverage under the Illinois 8    Public Labor Relations Act, personal assistants providing 9    services under the Department's Home Services Program 10    shall be considered to be public employees and the State 11    of Illinois shall be considered to be their employer as of 12    July 16, 2003 (the effective date of Public Act 93-204), 13    but not before. Solely for the purposes of coverage under 14    the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act, home care and 15    home health workers who function as personal assistants 16    and individual maintenance home health workers and who 17    also provide services under the Department's Home Services 18    Program shall be considered to be public employees, no 19    matter whether the State provides such services through 20    direct fee-for-service arrangements, with the assistance 21    of a managed care organization or other intermediary, or 22    otherwise, and the State of Illinois shall be considered 23    to be the employer of those persons as of January 29, 2013 24    (the effective date of Public Act 97-1158), but not before 25    except as otherwise provided under this subsection (f). 26    The State shall engage in collective bargaining with an   SB2971- 6 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    exclusive representative of home care and home health 2    workers who function as personal assistants and individual 3    maintenance home health workers working under the Home 4    Services Program concerning their terms and conditions of 5    employment that are within the State's control. Nothing in 6    this paragraph shall be understood to limit the right of 7    the persons receiving services defined in this Section to 8    hire and fire home care and home health workers who 9    function as personal assistants and individual maintenance 10    home health workers working under the Home Services 11    Program or to supervise them within the limitations set by 12    the Home Services Program. The State shall not be 13    considered to be the employer of home care and home health 14    workers who function as personal assistants and individual 15    maintenance home health workers working under the Home 16    Services Program for any purposes not specifically 17    provided in Public Act 93-204 or Public Act 97-1158, 18    including but not limited to, purposes of vicarious 19    liability in tort and purposes of statutory retirement or 20    health insurance benefits. Home care and home health 21    workers who function as personal assistants and individual 22    maintenance home health workers and who also provide 23    services under the Department's Home Services Program 24    shall not be covered by the State Employees Group 25    Insurance Act of 1971.26        The Department shall execute, relative to nursing home   SB2971- 7 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    prescreening, as authorized by Section 4.03 of the 2    Illinois Act on the Aging, written inter-agency agreements 3    with the Department on Aging and the Department of 4    Healthcare and Family Services, to effect the intake 5    procedures and eligibility criteria for those persons who 6    may need long term care. On and after July 1, 1996, all 7    nursing home prescreenings for individuals 18 through 59 8    years of age shall be conducted by the Department, or a 9    designee of the Department.10        The Department is authorized to establish a system of 11    recipient cost-sharing for services provided under this 12    Section. The cost-sharing shall be based upon the 13    recipient's ability to pay for services, but in no case 14    shall the recipient's share exceed the actual cost of the 15    services provided. Protected income shall not be 16    considered by the Department in its determination of the 17    recipient's ability to pay a share of the cost of 18    services. The level of cost-sharing shall be adjusted each 19    year to reflect changes in the "protected income" level. 20    The Department shall deduct from the recipient's share of 21    the cost of services any money expended by the recipient 22    for disability-related expenses.23        To the extent permitted under the federal Social 24    Security Act, the Department, or the Department's 25    authorized representative, may recover the amount of 26    moneys expended for services provided to or in behalf of a   SB2971- 8 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    person under this Section by a claim against the person's 2    estate or against the estate of the person's surviving 3    spouse, but no recovery may be had until after the death of 4    the surviving spouse, if any, and then only at such time 5    when there is no surviving child who is under age 21 or 6    blind or who has a permanent and total disability. This 7    paragraph, however, shall not bar recovery, at the death 8    of the person, of moneys for services provided to the 9    person or in behalf of the person under this Section to 10    which the person was not entitled; provided that such 11    recovery shall not be enforced against any real estate 12    while it is occupied as a homestead by the surviving 13    spouse or other dependent, if no claims by other creditors 14    have been filed against the estate, or, if such claims 15    have been filed, they remain dormant for failure of 16    prosecution or failure of the claimant to compel 17    administration of the estate for the purpose of payment. 18    This paragraph shall not bar recovery from the estate of a 19    spouse, under Sections 1915 and 1924 of the Social 20    Security Act and Section 5-4 of the Illinois Public Aid 21    Code, who precedes a person receiving services under this 22    Section in death. All moneys for services paid to or in 23    behalf of the person under this Section shall be claimed 24    for recovery from the deceased spouse's estate. 25    "Homestead", as used in this paragraph, means the dwelling 26    house and contiguous real estate occupied by a surviving   SB2971- 9 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    spouse or relative, as defined by the rules and 2    regulations of the Department of Healthcare and Family 3    Services, regardless of the value of the property.4        This paragraph applies to direct service workers 5    employed by the Department, or by an agency that is 6    contracted with the Department, to provide services to 7    individuals participating in the Home Services Program. 8    Direct service workers employed by the Department or a 9    contractor shall complete at least 2 hours of dementia 10    training at the start of their employment. Direct service 11    workers who are employees of the Department or a 12    contractor on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 13    the 104th General Assembly shall complete this training 14    within 6 months after the effective date of this 15    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. The training 16    shall cover the following subjects: (1) Alzheimer's 17    disease and dementia; (2) safety risks; and (3) 18    communication and behavior. Annual continuing education 19    training shall include at least 2 hours of dementia 20    training covering the subjects described in this 21    paragraph. The Department shall provide contractors with 22    dementia training curriculum on the subjects described in 23    this paragraph. The purpose of this paragraph is to 24    improve the quality of training for direct service workers 25    under the Home Services Program. If laws or rules existing 26    on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th   SB2971- 10 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    General Assembly contain more rigorous dementia training 2    requirements for Department employees or contractors 3    providing direct services under the Home Services Program, 4    then those laws or rules shall apply. An individual who is 5    required to receive dementia training under any other law 6    or rule may be considered exempt from the requirements of 7    this paragraph, if the other law's or rule's training 8    requirement includes a minimum 2 hours of dementia 9    training. The individual shall be required to show proof 10    that he or she received dementia training equivalent to 11    the training required under this paragraph. For personal 12    assistants covered by a collective bargaining agreement, 13    the Department shall work with the joint training 14    committee established by the collective bargaining 15    agreement covering personal assistants to discuss 16    parameters and specific topics for curriculum covering 17    dementia training as part of the provided training for 18    personal assistants. 19        (g) To establish such subdivisions of the Department 20    as shall be desirable and assign to the various 21    subdivisions the responsibilities and duties placed upon 22    the Department by law.23        (h) To cooperate and enter into any necessary 24    agreements with the Department of Employment Security for 25    the provision of job placement and job referral services 26    to clients of the Department, including job service   SB2971- 11 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    registration of such clients with Illinois Employment 2    Security offices and making job listings maintained by the 3    Department of Employment Security available to such 4    clients.5        (i) To possess all powers reasonable and necessary for 6    the exercise and administration of the powers, duties and 7    responsibilities of the Department which are provided for 8    by law.9        (j) (Blank).10        (k) (Blank).11        (l) To establish, operate, and maintain a Statewide 12    Housing Clearinghouse of information on available 13    government subsidized housing accessible to persons with 14    disabilities and available privately owned housing 15    accessible to persons with disabilities. The information 16    shall include, but not be limited to, the location, rental 17    requirements, access features and proximity to public 18    transportation of available housing. The Clearinghouse 19    shall consist of at least a computerized database for the 20    storage and retrieval of information and a separate or 21    shared toll free telephone number for use by those seeking 22    information from the Clearinghouse. Department offices and 23    personnel throughout the State shall also assist in the 24    operation of the Statewide Housing Clearinghouse. 25    Cooperation with local, State, and federal housing 26    managers shall be sought and extended in order to   SB2971- 12 -LRB104 17614 KTG 31045 b1    frequently and promptly update the Clearinghouse's 2    information.3        (m) To assure that the names and case records of 4    persons who received or are receiving services from the 5    Department, including persons receiving vocational 6    rehabilitation, home services, or other services, and 7    those attending one of the Department's schools or other 8    supervised facility shall be confidential and not be open 9    to the general public. Those case records and reports or 10    the information contained in those records and reports 11    shall be disclosed by the Director only to proper law 12    enforcement officials, individuals authorized by a court, 13    the General Assembly or any committee or commission of the 14    General Assembly, and other persons and for reasons as the 15    Director designates by rule. Disclosure by the Director 16    may be only in accordance with other applicable law.17(Source: P.A. 102-264, eff. 8-6-21; 102-826, eff. 5-13-22; 18103-479, eff. 1-1-24.)